Utah statutes.
34-38-6.   Requirements for collection and testing.
(1)  The collection and testing of a sample for drugs and alcohol under this
chapter shall be performed in accordance with this chapter.
(2)  The collection of a sample shall be performed under reasonable and
sanitary conditions.
(3)  A sample shall be collected and tested:
(a)  with due regard to the privacy of the individual being tested; and
(b)  in a manner reasonably calculated to prevent substitutions or
interference with the collection or testing of a reliable sample.
(4)  The sample collection shall be documented.  The documentation procedures
required by this Subsection (4) include:
(a)  labeling of a sample so as reasonably to preclude the probability of
erroneous identification of test results; and
(b)  an opportunity for the employee or prospective employee to provide
notification of any information that the employee or prospective employee
considers relevant to the test, including:
(i)  identification of currently or recently used prescription or
nonprescription drugs; or
(ii)  other relevant medical information.
(5)  Sample collection, storage, and transportation to the place of testing
shall be performed so as reasonably to preclude the probability of sample
contamination or adulteration.
(6) (a)  Testing of a sample shall conform to scientifically accepted
analytical methods and procedures.
(b)  Before a test of a sample may be considered a failed test and used as a
basis for an action by an employer under Section 34-38-8, testing of the
sample shall include a confirmation test:
(i)  by gas chromatography, gas chromatography-mass spectroscopy, or other
comparably reliable analytical method; and
(ii)  if the sample used for a test is a urine sample, by a laboratory that is
certified by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under
the National Laboratory Certification Program.
